test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kheeqles_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeeʹles contract stem valehtelija: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Nom: ǩeeʹles
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Gen: ǩeâlˈlaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Acc: ǩeâlˈlaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Loc: ǩeâlˈlsest
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Com: ǩeâlˈlsin
     ǩeeʹles+N+Ess: ǩeâlˈlsen
     ǩeeʹles+N+Par: ǩeâlˈlsed
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Abe: [ǩeâlˈlaztaa, ǩeâlˈlaztää]
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Nom: ǩeâlˈlaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Acc: ǩeâlˈlsid
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Ill: ǩeâlˈlsid
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Loc: ǩeâlˈlsin
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Com: ǩeâlˈlsivuiʹm
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Abe: [ǩeâlˈlsitaa, ǩeâlˈlsitää]
     
